Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 11. Insect Infestation and Diseases of Forest Trees.

§ 10.1-1177.
Authority of Department of Forestry.

The Department of Forestry is authorized to and responsible for (i) investigating insect infestations and disease infections which affect stands of forest trees, and (ii) devising and demonstrating control measures to interested persons. The State Forester shall administer the provisions of this article. Authority for quarantine procedure now vested in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall remain in that Department.

History.

1952, c. 657, § 10-90.3; 1986, c. 567; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1178.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Forest land”
means land on which forest trees are found.

“Forest trees”
means only those trees which are a part of and constitute a stand of potential, immature, or mature commercial timber trees. The term “forest trees” includes shade trees of any species around houses, along highways and within cities and towns if the trees constitute an insect or disease menace to nearby timber trees or timber stands.

“Infection”
means infection by any disease affecting forest trees which is declared by the State Forester to be dangerously injurious to forest trees.

“Infestation”
means infestation by means of any insect which is declared by the State Forester to be dangerously injurious to forest trees.

“Person”
includes an individual, partnership, corporation, company, society or association.

History.

1952, c. 657, § 10-90.4; 1986, c. 539; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1179.
State Forester to investigate; notice to landowners.

Where an insect infestation or disease infection is believed to exist on forest land within this Commonwealth, the State Forester shall investigate the condition. Whenever he finds that an infestation or infection exists he shall give notice in writing by mail or otherwise to each forest landowner within the affected area, advising him of the nature of the infestation or infection and the recommended control measures, and offering him technical advice on methods of carrying out control measures.

History.

1952, c. 657, § 10-90.5; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1180.
Cooperation with individuals and public agencies.

The Department of Forestry is authorized to cooperate with persons, counties, state agencies, and United States government agencies, and the appropriate authorities of adjacent states concerning forest tree insect and disease investigation and control, and to accept money, gifts and donations and to disburse the same for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this article.

History.

1952, c. 657, § 10-90.7; 1986, c. 567; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1181.
Control of Forest Tree Insects and Diseases Fund.

A special fund in the state treasury known as the Control of Forest Tree Insects and Diseases Fund shall consist of all moneys appropriated thereto by the General Assembly, all revenues collected under the provisions of this article, and any moneys paid into the state treasury or to the State Forester, the Board of Forestry, or the Department of Forestry by the federal government or any agency thereof to be used for the purposes of this article. All such funds are hereby appropriated to the Department of Forestry to be used to carry out the purposes of this article.

History.

1952, c. 657, § 10-90.9; 1986, c. 567; 1988, c. 891.